Wisconsin, session 2025, AB826.
do enact as follows:AB826,11Section 1. 118.07 (4) (bm) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB826,2,72118.07 (4) (bm) 2. General guidelines specifying procedures for emergency 3prevention and mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery, including 4procedures for informing pupils and pupils’ families that an event has occurred that 5triggered a response under the school safety plan and procedures for debriefing 6pupils, staff, and pupils’ families after an event addressed in the school safety plan 7has occurred.AB826,28Section 2. Effective date.AB826,2,99(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2026.AB826,2,1010